Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,106
Commission members; appointment.

The Governor and Secretary of State shall make their appointments in such a manner as to assure that not more than four of the eight appointed members of the commission shall be from the same political party and at least one member shall be registered as an independent and such person shall have been so registered for at least two years prior to his appointment. The appointments provided for in subdivisions (1)(a), (2)(a), and (2)(b) of section 49-14,105 shall be made prior to any other appointments. The appointment provided for in subdivision (1)(b) of section 49-14,105 shall precede the appointment provided for in subdivision (2)(c) of section 49-14,105.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 106;

Laws 1979, LB 54, § 2.